New York, session 2025-2026, A5858.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "moped 2 registration verification act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 391-v of the general business law is 4 amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 5 (e) "Worker" means a natural person who is hired or retained as an 6 independent contractor by a delivery business to make deliveries in 7 exchange for compensation. 8 § 3. Section 391-v of the general business law is amended by adding a 9 new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 10 3. (a) A third-party food delivery service shall verify that any work- 11 er who elects to operate a limited-use motorcycle, as such term is 12 defined by section one hundred twenty-one-b of the vehicle and traffic 13 law, in the course of making deliveries for such third-party food deliv- 14 ery service has registered such limited-use motorcycle pursuant to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09233-13-6 A. 5858--D 2 1 section twenty-two hundred sixty-one of the vehicle and traffic law or 2 registered pursuant to the applicable laws of another state. 3 (b) A third-party food delivery service shall verify that any worker 4 who elects to operate a motor vehicle, as such term is defined by 5 section one hundred twenty-five of the vehicle and traffic law, in the 6 course of making deliveries for such third-party food delivery service 7 has registered such motor vehicle pursuant to section four hundred one 8 of the vehicle and traffic law or registered pursuant to the applicable 9 laws of another state. A third-party food delivery service may satisfy 10 the requirements of this paragraph if, as a condition in its agreement 11 with the worker, the third-party delivery service shall require that the 12 worker has registered the motor vehicle the worker elects to operate in 13 the course of making deliveries for such third-party food delivery 14 service pursuant to the vehicle and traffic law or to the applicable 15 laws of another state. 16 (c) A third-party food delivery service shall record each such verifi- 17 cation required by paragraph (a) or (b) of this subdivision and retain 18 such record for at least one year following the termination of such 19 worker's employment by or engagement with such third-party food delivery 20 service. 21 (d) A third-party food delivery service shall not sell, share, or 22 allow access to such information collected and maintained pursuant to 23 this section unless required to comply with federal, state, or local 24 laws, rules, or regulations. 25 (e) Provided, however, that nothing contained in this subdivision 26 shall be deemed to supersede the provisions of article forty-four-b of 27 the vehicle and traffic law. 28 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 29 it shall have become a law.